Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15.123 Iowa-Ireland trade commission. 1. There is created the Iowa-Ireland trade commission. The authority shall provide administrative support for the commission. 2. The commission shall be composed of the following members: a. Two state senators appointed by the majority leader of the senate. Each senator shall have knowledge of or current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs or shall have interest in the well-being of trade relations between the state and the Republic of Ireland. b. Two state representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Each representative shall have knowledge of or current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs or shall have interest in the well-being of trade relations between the state and the Republic of Ireland. c. A representative of a private sector association headquartered in the state and focused on the promotion of international trade, appointed by the chair of the legislative council. Senate File 2411, p. 2 d. A representative of the authority, appointed by the governor. e. A representative of an Iowa private industry, appointed by the majority leader of the senate. f. A representative of an Iowa private industry, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 3. Each member of the commission shall serve for a term of two years and may be reappointed without limit. A vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the original appointing authority for the remainder of the term. 4. A commission member shall not receive compensation for services. 5. At the initial meeting of the commission and biennially thereafter, the commission members shall select a chairperson from the state senators and state representatives appointed to serve on the commission. 6. The commission shall meet a minimum of once per quarter, at the call of the chairperson. The commission may meet or hold hearings at any location that will best serve the citizens of the state. All meetings or hearings of the commission shall be scheduled and conducted in compliance with chapter 21. 7. The commissionâs records shall be considered public records pursuant to chapter 22. 8. A majority of the members of the commission is a quorum, and a majority of a quorum may act in any matter within the jurisdiction of the commission. 9. The Iowa-Ireland trade commission shall do all of the following: a. Promote the advancement of bilateral trade and investment between this state and the Republic of Ireland. b. Recommend joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to this state and the Republic of Ireland. c. Promote business and academic exchanges between this state and the Republic of Ireland. d. Encourage mutual economic support between this state and the Republic of Ireland. e. Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of this state and the Republic of Ireland. f. Address other issues as determined by the commission. Senate File 2411, p. 3 10. The commission shall submit a report to the governor and the general assembly within one calendar year of the date of the commissionâs organizational meeting, and by February 1 of each year thereafter. The report shall detail the commissionâs meetings, activities, and expenses for the immediately preceding calendar year. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2411, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor